Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.215

Sewerage lien—Extension of coverage.

Any city or town may, by resolution or ordinance, provide that the sewerage lien shall be effective for a total not to exceed one year's delinquent service charges without the necessity of any writing or recording of the lien with the county auditor, in lieu of the provisions provided for in RCW 35.67.210.

[ 1991 c 36 s 3.]